Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.230

Charges for livestock inspection—Actual inspection required.

No person shall collect or make a charge for inspection of livestock unless there has been an actual inspection of the livestock.

[ 2003 c 326 s 26; 1995 c 374 s 50; 1959 c 54 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.